Utah statutes.
17-22-25.   Service of process on sheriff -- When constable to act.

In cases where it appears in any court of record that the sheriff is a party, or where an affidavit is filed with the clerk of the court stating partiality, prejudice, consanguinity or interest on the part of the sheriff, the clerk of the court shall direct process to any constable of the county, whose duty it shall be to execute it in the same manner as if he were sheriff.



No Change Since 1953

